Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska83-1,129
Board of Pardons; pardon authority; application; consideration.

(1) Any person desiring the Board of Pardons to exercise its pardon authority shall request an application from its secretary. The application shall be returned to the secretary and shall state the specific relief requested and such other information as is prescribed by the board.

(2) Any person whose operator's license has been revoked pursuant to a conviction for a violation of section 60-6,196 or 60-6,197 for a third or subsequent time for a period of fifteen years and who desires the Board of Pardons to exercise its pardon authority shall make application pursuant to section 60-6,209.

(3) Any application filed pursuant to subsection (1) or (2) of this section shall be considered with or without a hearing by the board at its next regular scheduled meeting. If a hearing is held, it shall be conducted in an informal manner and a record of the proceedings shall be made and preserved according to the guidelines of the board.

Laws 1969, c. 817, § 60, p. 3103;

Laws 1994, LB 677, § 15;

Laws 1998, LB 309, § 26;

Laws 2003, LB 209, § 17;

Laws 2004, LB 208, § 23.

There are no provisions in Nebraska's Constitution or its statutes creating a liberty interest in commutation hearings other than the right to file an application for commutation. Otey v. State, 240 Neb. 813, 485 N.W.2d 153 (1992).